California, session 20252026, AB2468.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. The Legislature finds and declares all of the following:(a) Under longstanding state and federal law, pupils with disabilities have the right to be educated in the least restrictive environment, which provides needed supports in general education settings with the greatest possible access to peers and promotes inclusion through belonging, relationships, and full participation in the school community.(b) Despite decades of effort to increase least restrictive environment placements, California has made slow progress, and the state’s rate of inclusion continues to lag behind most other states.(c) Pupils with disabilities have consistently been identified by the California School Dashboard as a low-performing pupil group, triggering various kinds of support and intervention.(d) The Supporting Inclusive Practices project (SIP project) works to increase opportunities for pupils with disabilities to access education in general education settings and goes beyond basic access to ensure that pupils experience authentic learning environments rooted in belonging, which improves attendance, reduces discipline, increases graduation rates, and supports postsecondary success.(e) Research has shown that the SIP project is highly effective. Local educational agencies working with the SIP project have experienced growth in placements in the least restrictive environment 13 times the state average and 6 times the national average. In school districts working with the SIP project, achievement in English language arts and math improves among pupils with disabilities.(f) Expanding the SIP project and building on its existing alignment and partnerships with statewide improvement initiatives would significantly broaden its reach and bring systemwide coherence to benefit both disabled and nondisabled pupils in California.SEC. 2. Section 52073.6 is added to the Education Code, to read:52073.6. (a) Commencing with the 2027–28 fiscal year, The Supporting Inclusive Practices project is hereby established, to be administered independently and in coordination in accordance with subdivision (b) by the department and the California Collaborative for Educational Excellence, with funds appropriated to each agency for these purposes, through contracts or memoranda of understanding with one or two county offices of education designated by the collaborative, shall administer the Supporting Inclusive Practices project and shall expand the project and build on its alignment and partnerships with statewide improvement initiatives. education. The purposes of this project are to do all of the following:(1) Improve pupil outcomes, as measured by the California School Dashboard pursuant to Section 52064.5, by increasing opportunities for pupils with disabilities to access education in general education settings, as mandated by the federal Individuals with Disabilities Education Act (20 U.S.C. Sec. 1400 et seq.), and as measured by state performance plan indicators related to least restrictive environment, including in preschool, and pupil academic achievement.(2) Align and integrate with differentiated assistance, direct technical assistance, and other initiatives within the statewide system of support, and with the department’s Compliance and Improvement Monitoring general supervision process, and leverage expertise of the project in serving pupils with disabilities across improvement initiatives housed at the California Collaborative for Educational Excellence.(3) Support the educator workforce to serve pupils with disabilities.(4) Provide technical assistance to local educational agencies and charter schools to improve inclusive outcomes for pupils with disabilities.(b) The department and the California Collaborative for Educational Excellence shall administer the project as follows:(1) The department shall administer the direct support components of the project, deploying targeted technical assistance to support local educational agencies and charter schools identified as not meeting state performance plan indicators pursuant to the federal Individuals with Disabilities Education Act (20 U.S.C. Sec. 1400 et seq.) and selected for monitoring under the general supervision process to meet the state’s requirements under Sections 300.600, 300.604(a), and 300.604(b) of Title 34 of the Code of Federal Regulations that support inclusive outcomes for pupils with disabilities.(b)In administering the project, the(2) The California Collaborative for Educational Excellence shall align and integrate the administer the universal support components of the project, providing support and resources to local educational agencies and charter schools in all regions of the state, and integrating the project with differentiated assistance, direct technical assistance, and other initiatives within the statewide system of support. The California Collaborative for Educational Excellence shall conduct, at a minimum, the following activities:(c)The project shall conduct, at a minimum, all of the following activities:(1)Providing technical assistance to local educational agencies and charter schools focused on supporting evidence-based practices to increase access by pupils with disabilities to education in general education settings, and supporting progress toward a high school diploma for children and pupils with disabilities. This technical assistance shall include, but not be limited to, technical assistance on staffing arrangements that support access by pupils with disabilities to education in the general education setting, including, but not limited to, coteaching, with a focus on strategies that support the retention of education specialists in the teaching profession.(2)Establishing demonstration sites in each geographic lead agency region of the state that showcase evidence-based practices at different grade levels and with different pupil populations, and facilitating tours of teams of staff from other local educational agencies and charter schools to learn from these sites.(3)Holding inclusion academies, which are innovative professional learning experiences for regional teams designed to support the design and implementation of systemwide inclusive culture, policies, and practices, including collaborating with partners in school districts, county offices of education, special education local plan areas, and statewide system of support technical assistance providers. The project shall also use local data to develop a strategic plan centered in a culture of accountability and meaningful inclusion.(4)Working with teacher preparation programs in each major region to establish inclusive placement pipelines, including by the use of demonstration site visits described in paragraph (2) and inclusion academies described in paragraph (3).(5)Working with early childhood-related technical assistance providers, including by providing statewide support for the Inclusive Early Education Expansion Program grant established pursuant to Section 8337.(6)Developing and making resources available to all local educational agencies and charter schools, including, but not limited to, webinar events, social media, podcasts, recorded resources on inclusion topics, and requested professional development.(7)Providing support and technical assistance to local educational agencies and charter schools using the statewide individualized education program template, as authorized to be developed by the Budget Act of 2020 (Chs. 6, 7, and 40, Stats. 2020, and Chs. 1, 4, 14, 40, Stats. 2021), to support access by pupils with disabilities to education in general education settings.(8)Implementing the activities of the project in a manner that leverages and aligns with existing improvement efforts administered by the California Collaborative for Educational Excellence to build local educational agency and charter school capacity and support systemwide improvement.(9)Coordinating and aligning its work with other statewide initiatives administered by the department, including initiatives in literacy, community schools, and early learning, to provide coherence across improvement efforts and reduce duplication of technical assistance.(d)The project shall do all of the following:(1)Collaborate with an institution of higher education to support evaluation of the project, including the use of evidence-based practices, for the purpose of continuous improvement of the project.(2)Ensure that all regions of the state are provided with access to the project’s support.(3)Prioritize support, as directed by the California Collaborative for Educational Excellence through agreement with the department, to local educational agencies and charter schools that have been identified for both differentiated assistance or direct technical assistance related to outcomes for pupils with disabilities and for intensive intervention through the department’s compliance monitoring system.(e)The department may contract with the California Collaborative for Educational Excellence for the project to provide technical assistance to local educational agencies and charter schools identified as not meeting state performance plan indicators, including, but not limited to, least restrictive environment pursuant to the federal Individuals with Disabilities Education Act (20 U.S.C. Sec. 1400 et seq.) and those local educational agencies and charter schools identified for intensive intervention through the department’s compliance monitoring system. (A) Providing technical assistance to local educational agencies and charter schools focused on supporting evidence-based practices to increase access by pupils with disabilities to education in general education settings.(B) Establishing demonstration sites.(C) Holding inclusion academies.(D) Working with teacher preparation programs to establish inclusive clinical placement pipelines.(E) Developing and making resources available to all local educational agencies and charter schools.(F) Collaborating with an institution of higher education to support evaluation of the project.(3) The department and the California Collaborative for Educational Excellence shall administer their respective components of the project, as identified in paragraphs (1) and (2), independently with funds appropriated for those purposes, but shall coordinate their activities to ensure alignment between the universal support activities and the direct support activities. This coordination shall, at a minimum, address all of the following:(A) A shared referral process by which local educational agencies and charter schools receiving universal support from the collaborative may be referred to the department for direct support when their needs exceed the scope of the universal support.(B) Joint data sharing protocols to allow both agencies to track local educational agency and charter school participation, progress, and outcomes across the full continuum of project activities.(C) Annual joint review of activities and outcomes to identify gaps, overlaps, and opportunities for enhanced coordination.(f)(c) The California Collaborative for Educational Excellence project shall, for each year in which funding is appropriated for the project, submit a report to the appropriate fiscal and policy committees of the Legislature, in compliance with Section 9795 of the Government Code, the department, the state board, and the Department of Finance. Each report shall include, but not be limited to, all of the following information:(1) A summary of the activities conducted, including local educational agency and charter school participation by activity.(2) The number of local educational agencies and charter schools, educators, and pupils served by the project.(3) A summary of outcome data of local educational agencies and charter schools receiving direct technical assistance, including, but not limited to, performance on state performance plan indicators, and the indicators used on the California School Dashboard, and the Desired Results Developmental Profile. Dashboard.(4) How the project has worked with other initiatives housed at the California Collaborative for Educational Excellence. state initiatives.(5) Recommendations for improving state-level activities or policies.(g)(d) When carrying out activities pursuant to this section, the department and the California Collaborative for Educational Excellence shall adhere to, and inform local educational agencies and charter schools with which it works of, the requirements of Section 56040.6, pertaining to pupils who are deaf, hard of hearing, or deaf-blind.(h)(e) This section shall not be construed as modifying or otherwise affecting the right of pupils with disabilities, including pupils who are deaf, hard of hearing, or deaf-blind, to a free and appropriate public education pursuant to the federal Individuals with Disabilities Education Act (20 U.S.C. Sec. 1400 et seq.), the development of an individualized education program, as defined in Section 56032, or the individualized education program team’s determination of placement pursuant to Sections 300.320 to 300.328, inclusive, of Title 34 of the Code of Federal Regulations and Section 56345, aids to ensure effective communication pursuant to Section 35.160 of Title 28 of the Code of Federal Regulations, or the continuum of program options required to be made available pursuant to Sections 56000.5, 56360, and 56361.(i)(f) The implementation of this section is contingent upon an appropriation for its purposes in the annual Budget Act or another statute. It is the intent of the Legislature that a minimum of thirty million dollars ($30,000,000) over five years be appropriated to the California Collaborative for Educational Excellence for the purpose of this act. act, in addition to funding in the annual Budget Act or another statute for the department for the purpose of this act.SEC. 3.If the Commission on State Mandates determines that this act contains costs mandated by the state, reimbursement to local agencies and school districts for those costs shall be made pursuant to Part 7 (commencing with Section 17500) of Division 4 of Title 2 of the Government Code.